Utah statutes.
77-23a-16.   Communications provider -- Cooperation and support services --
Compensation -- Liability defense.
(1)  Upon the request of an attorney for the government or an officer of a law
enforcement agency authorized to install and use pen registers under this
chapter, a provider of wire or electronic communications service, landlord,
custodian, or other person shall furnish investigative or law enforcement
officers forthwith all information, facilities, and technical assistance
necessary to accomplish the installation of the pen register unobtrusively and
with a minimum of interference with the services the person ordered by the
court accords the party regarding whom the installation and use is to take
place, if such assistance is directed by a court order as provided in
Subsection 77-23a-15 (2) (b) of this chapter.
(2) (a)  Upon request of an attorney for the government or an officer of a law
enforcement agency authorized to receive the results of a trap and trace
device under this chapter, a provider of wire or electronic communications
service, landlord, custodian, or other person shall install the device
forthwith on the appropriate line.
(b)  He shall also furnish the investigative or law enforcement officer all
additional information, facilities, and technical assistance, including
installation and operation of the device unobtrusively and with a minimum of
interference with the services that the person so ordered by the court accords
the party with respect to whom the installation and use is to take place, if
the installation and assistance is directed by a court order under Section
77-23a-15 (2) (b).
(c)  Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the results of the trap and trace
device shall be furnished to the officer of the law enforcement agency
designated by the court, at reasonable intervals and during regular business
hours, for the duration of the order.
(3)  A provider of wire or electronic communications service, landlord,
custodian, or other person who furnishes facilities or technical assistance
under this section shall be reasonably compensated for reasonable expenses
incurred in providing the facilities and assistance.
(4)  A cause of action does not lie in any court against the provider of wire
or electronic communications service, its officers, employees, agents, or
other specified persons, for providing information, facilities, or assistance
in accordance with the terms of a court order under this chapter.
(5)  A good faith reliance on a court order, a legislative authorization, or a
statutory authorization, is a complete defense against any civil or criminal
action brought under this chapter or any other law.
